Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
846

HAWAII CRIMINAL JUSTICE DATA CENTER;

CIVIL
IDENTIFICATION

Part I. Data Center

Section

846-1 Definitions

846-1.5 Repealed

846-2 Establishment of the Hawaii criminal
justice data

center

846-2.5 Purpose of the criminal justice data
center

846-2.6 Computerized fingerprint identification
system

846-2.7 Criminal history record checks

846-3 Reporting to data center

846-4 Query of data center

846-5 Reporting of dispositions

846-6 Systematic audit

846-7 Security

846-8 Exclusions

846-9 Limitations on dissemination

846-10 Dissemination

846-10.5 Fees

846-10.6 Criminal history record improvement
revolving fund;

established

846-11 Coordination with department of public
safety

846-12 Juvenile records

846-13 Annual audits

846-14 Access and review

846-15 Rules and regulations

846-16 Violations

846-17 Administration of National Crime
Prevention and Privacy

Compact

846-18
Statistical crime reporting responsibility of county

chiefs
of police and state and county agencies

Part II. Civil Identification--Repealed

846-21 to 38 Repealed

Part III. Background Checks--Repealed

846-41 to 45 Repealed

Part IV. Hate Crime Reporting

846-51 Definitions

846-52 Responsibility for system

846-53 Responsibility of agencies

846-54 Annual reports

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1983, c 78, §3(1); L 1984, c 95,
§12.

Cross References

International matchmaking organizations, see chapter 489N.

Registration of sex offenders and other offenders, see
chapter 846E.

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next